Utah statutes.
39-6-79.   Assault or willful disobedience of an officer.

A person subject to this chapter shall be punished as a military court directs, who:

(1)  strikes his superior commissioned officer or draws or lifts up any weapon or offers any violence against him while he is in the execution of his office; or

(2)  willfully disobeys a lawful command of his superior commissioned officer.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

